other/words.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N
+Sg
+Sg.Def
+Pl
+3Sg.Masc
+3Sg.Fem
+1Pl.Past

LEXICON Root
Verb    ;

LEXICON Verb
+V+:0    VStem    ;

LEXICON VStem
sug     VSuffix;
kab     VSuffix;
sid     VSuffix;
dil     VSuffix;
gan     VSuffix;
tun     VSuffix;
arag    VSuffix;
guðub   VSuffix;
qosol   VSuffix;
haðal   VSuffix;

LEXICON VSuffix
+3Sg.Masc:^aj    #;
+3Sg.Fem:^taj    #;
+1Pl.Past:^naj   #;
